skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/h__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hO</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ham</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hO</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hA</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xBiH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>he</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>xByaH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hoH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hAm</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hi</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hoH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>tsu</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>w</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>hO</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>haH</l><r>h<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
